Hawaii statutes.
§437D-15 Unfair trade practices. Each
lessor, and each officer, employee, agent, and other representative thereof, is
prohibited from engaging in any practice constituting a violation of chapter
480. The following shall be per se violations of section 480-2:

(1) The making of any material statement that has the
tendency or capacity to mislead or deceive, either orally or in writing, in
connection with the rental of, offer to rent, or advertisement to rent a
vehicle;

(2) The omission of any material statement that has
the tendency or capacity to mislead or deceive, in connection with the rental
of, offer to rent, or advertisement to rent a vehicle;

(3) The making of any statement to the effect that
the purchase of a damage waiver is mandatory;

(4) Any violation of sections 437D-5 through 437D-14,
and section 437D-17.5;

(5) The charging by the lessor to a lessee of:

(A) More than the cost of the parts and labor
necessary to repair a damaged vehicle in accordance with standard practice in
the motor vehicle repair industry in the community, if the vehicle is repaired;

(B) More than the actual cash value of a
vehicle if it is declared a total loss;

(C) More than the diminution in value of a
vehicle if it is not repaired and not declared a total loss; or

(D) More than the cost of the parts and labor
necessary to repair a damaged vehicle in accordance with standard practice in
the motor vehicle repair industry in the community if the vehicle is not
repaired and is not declared a total loss but is determined by the lessor to be
no longer in rentable condition; provided that the vehicle shall not be rented
or leased by the lessor to any other lessee after that determination has been
made by the lessor.

To the extent the lessor obtains recovery from a
third party, the lessor shall not recover any amount specified in this
paragraph from the lessee;

(6) The making of any statement by the lessor to the
effect that the lessee is or will be confined to remain within boundaries
specified by the lessor unless payment or an agreement relating to the payment
of damages has been made by the lessee;

(7) The charging of a lessee more than a reasonable
estimate of the actual income lost for loss of use of a vehicle; and

(8) The charging of a lessee more than actual towing
charges. [L 1988, c 251, pt of §2; am L 1994, c 44, §1; am L 2000, c 145, §1;
am L 2009, c 148, §12]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next